Utah statutes.
64-13-14.6.   Inmate trusty status.
(1)  The department may grant an offender trusty status.
(2)  Trusty status may be granted to an inmate who has:
(a)  been granted a release date by the Board of Pardons and Parole; and
(b)  agreed to the terms and conditions established by the department to
participate in compensatory service or work projects prior to his parole date.
(3)  The department shall develop rules governing inmates granted trusty
status.
